Colorado, session 2026A, SB068.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 22-7-1020 as
follows:
22-7-1020. Cap administration of standardized summative
assessments - federal waiver - definition.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES, "SUMMATIVE ASSESSMENT" MEANS AN ASSESSMENT THAT
MEASURES LEARNING ACCUMULATED BY A STUDENT THROUGH A COURSE
OF STUDY OVER A SEMESTER OR MORE AS DEMONSTRATED BY THE
STUDENT'S KNOWLEDGE AND SKILLS.
(2) TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY FEDERAL LAW, THE
DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION SHALL ENSURE THAT STANDARDIZED
SUMMATIVE ASSESSMENTS ARE ADMINISTERED TO THE MINIMUM EXTENT
PRACTICABLE WHILE STILL APPROPRIATELY AND EFFECTIVELY ASSESSING
THE ACADEMIC ACHIEVEMENT OF STUDENTS.
(3) PURSUANT TO 20 U.S.C. SEC. 7861, THE DEPARTMENT OF
EDUCATION SHALL, IF NECESSARY TO ADMINISTER SUMMATIVE
ASSESSMENTS TO THE MINIMUM EXTENT PRACTICABLE AS DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION, APPLY TO THE FEDERAL DEPARTMENT OF
EDUCATION FOR A WAIVER OF STATE ASSESSMENT REQUIREMENTS
PURSUANT TO 20 U.S.C. SEC. 6311 WITHIN NINETY DAYS AFTER THE
EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION. THE APPLICATION MAY BE FOR A
STRATEGIC WAIVER THAT PROPOSES A SHORTENED ASSESSMENT, A
SAMPLING MODEL OF ASSESSMENT, A MATRIX SAMPLING MODEL OF
ASSESSMENT, OR ANY OTHER STRATEGY IDENTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT
OF EDUCATION.
-2- SB26-068

SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-3- SB26-068